District of Columbia statutes.
16-5305

Required medium.

If a law of the District of Columbia requires that a sworn declaration be presented in a particular medium, an unsworn declaration shall be presented in that medium.

July 23, 2010, D.C. Law 18-191, § 2(b), 57 DCR 3400
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 5 of the Uniform Unsworn Foreign Declarations Act.